Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 320.3 of Title 52, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If an oil or gas well, production facility, storage
facility, processing facility, compressor station, pipeline, or any
oil and gas related facility located within three hundred (300) feet
of a residence is determined to be in violation of any applicable
statute, rule, permit condition, or order by either the Department
of Environmental Quality or the Oklahoma Corporation Commission, the
operating company shall be notified in writing of the violation.
Req. No. 15309 Page 1

Upon receipt of written notice of violation, the operating company
shall have one hundred twenty (120) days to fully correct the
violation and achieve compliance, unless a shorter period is
required due to an imminent threat to public health, safety, or the
environment. If the violation is not fully corrected within the
one-hundred-twenty-day period, the Oklahoma Corporation Commission
shall order operations to cease until the violation is corrected and
compliance is verified. Operations shall not resume until the
Oklahoma Corporation Commission determines that the violation has
been fully corrected and that continued operation will not pose a
risk to public health, safety, or the environment.
B. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or
restrict any other enforcement authority, penalty, or remedy
available to the state under existing law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15309 JBH 12/30/25







Req. No. 15309 Page 2